Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 197.18 of Title 40, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
All nonsalaried public school employee's wages shall be set at a
minimum of Fifteen Dollars ($15.00) per hour for hours worked in a
pay period. Any tips, gratuities, or other benefits may not apply
toward payment of the minimum hourly wage required in this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15618 TKR 01/08/26



Req. No. 15618 Page 1